Washington statutes.
RCW 15.80.470

Weighmaster's license—Renewal date—Penalty fee.

If an application for the annual renewal of any license provided for in this chapter is not filed prior to the current license expiration date, there shall be assessed and added to the renewal fee as a penalty therefor fifty percent of said renewal fee which shall be paid by the applicant before any renewal license shall be issued. The penalty shall not apply if the applicant furnishes a declaration that he or she has not acted as a weighmaster or weigher subsequent to the expiration of his or her prior license.

[ 2017 c 158 s 5; 2010 c 8 s 6103; 1991 c 109 s 8; 1969 ex.s. c 100 s 18.]